Oklahoma, session 2025, SB618.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 295 of Title 17, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


In addition to any other alert and warning requirements required


by law, any public utility, as defined pursuant to Section 151 of


Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes, shall develop an energy alert


system for the purpose of coordinating communications with county


and municipal governments. The system shall alert county and


municipal governments about potential outages, requests for usage


reduction during time periods of high demand, and any other


communications deemed necessary to maintain a stable and secure


electric grid.

Req. No. 667 Page 1


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-667 RD 1/19/2025 5:40:09 AM











































Req. No. 667 Page 2